West Virginia, session 2026, SB328.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-27-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 19, 2025, relating to the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists (qualifications, training, examination, and certification of instructors in barbering, hair styling, nail technology, aesthetics, waxing, and cosmetology, 3 CSR 02), is authorized with the amendments.